Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1427
Commission; administrative duties.

In order to carry out its responsibilities under sections 85-1421 to 85-1427, the commission shall:

(1) Periodically meet and confer with officials of the state and its political subdivisions having responsibility for postsecondary education services;

(2) Consult with and utilize the services of any office, department, or agency of the state; and

(3) Employ such personnel as may be necessary to assist it in the performance of its duties.

Laws 1978, LB 897, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 114;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 85-979;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 31.